Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6112.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "American Freedmen affairs act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "American Freedmen" means descendants of individuals emancipated from slavery in the United States. (b) "Department" means the department of civil rights. (c) "Director" means the director of the office or the director's designee. (d) "Office" means the office of Freedmen affairs created in section 3. Sec. 3. (1) The office of Freedmen affairs is created as an autonomous entity within the department. The office shall exercise the powers and perform the duties described in this act independently of the department. (2) The office shall advocate, coordinate, research, and make policy recommendations on matters affecting American Freedmen residing in this state. Sec. 4. The governor shall appoint a director to serve as the head of the office. The term of the director is 5 years. The governor may reappoint the director. The director shall administer, operate, and staff the office. Sec. 5. The office shall do all of the following: (a) Advise the governor and the legislature on policies, programs, and legislation affecting American Freedmen. (b) Provide policy recommendations, based on data, research, and community input, to the governor and the legislature to address documented disparities in the allocation of state resources, funding, and opportunities affecting American Freedmen. (c) Improve access to state programs, services, and benefits for American Freedmen through outreach, education, and coordination with state departments and agencies. (d) Develop and support initiatives to expand economic opportunity, workforce development, and entrepreneurship for American Freedmen. (e) Establish and maintain genealogy research assistance, archival resources, and historical documentation to support individuals seeking to identify and preserve American Freedmen heritage. (f) Conduct policy analysis, program evaluations, and data-informed assessments to measure the effectiveness of state actions affecting American Freedmen. (g) Solicit and consider input from American Freedmen communities, advocacy organizations, and other stakeholders to inform the office's priorities. (h) Partner with public, private, academic, and nonprofit organizations to advance the office's mission and align efforts across sectors. (i) Identify systemic barriers affecting American Freedmen and recommend strategies to state agencies and the legislature to address those barriers. Sec. 6. (1) The office may employ staff to carry out the purposes of this act, including individuals with expertise in policy analysis, community engagement, genealogy and historical research, and economic or financial planning. (2) The office may enter into contracts or agreements with academic institutions, nonprofit organizations, consultants, or other professionals as necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. Sec. 7. Not later than February 28 of each year, the office shall submit a report to the governor, the secretary of the senate, and the clerk of the house of representatives. The report must include all of the following: (a) A summary of the office's activities and accomplishments from the immediately preceding calendar year. (b) An assessment of the social, economic, and health conditions of American Freedmen residing in this state. (c) Recommendations for legislative, administrative, or policy actions to address identified disparities and improve outcomes. Sec. 8. The office may solicit and accept gifts, donations, grants, loans, appropriations, or other money from a federal, state, local, or private source to carry out the purposes of this act.